Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2087.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 601(a)(1), (2) and (3), (f)(4) and (g)(3) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, are amended to read:Section 601. (a) In addition to those persons included within the definition of the word "employe" as defined in section 104, "employe" shall also include:(1) members of volunteer fire departments or volunteer fire companies, including any paid fireman who is a member of a volunteer fire company and performs the services of a volunteer fireman during off-duty hours, who shall be entitled to receive compensation in case of injuries received while actively engaged 1234567891011121314151617181920 as firemen or while going to or returning from a fire which the fire company or fire department attended including travel from and the direct return to a fireman's home, place of business or other place where he shall have been when he received the call or alarm or while participating in instruction fire drills in which the fire department or fire company shall have participated or while repairing or doing other work about or on the fire apparatus or buildings and grounds of the fire company or fire department upon the authorization of the chief of the fire company or fire department or other person in charge or while answering any emergency calls for any purpose or while riding upon the fire apparatus which is owned or used by the fire company or fire department or while engaging in organized fundraising activities or while performing any other duties of such fire company or fire department as authorized by the municipality or while performing duties imposed by section 15, act of April 27, 1927 (P.L.465, No.299), referred to as the Fire and Panic Act;(2) all members of volunteer ambulance corps of the various municipalities who shall be and are hereby declared to be employes of such municipality for the purposes of this act who shall be entitled to receive compensation in the case of injuries received while actually engaged as ambulance corpsmen or while going to or returning from any fire, accident, or other emergency which such volunteer ambulance corps shall attend including travel from and the direct return to a corpsman's home, place of business or other place where he shall have been when he received the call or alarm; or while participating in ambulance corps of which they are members; or while repairing or doing other work about or on the ambulance apparatus or 20250HB2087PN2684 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 buildings and grounds of such ambulance corps upon the authorization of the corps president or other person in charge; or while answering any emergency call for any purpose; or while engaging in organized fundraising activities or while riding in or upon the ambulance apparatus owned by the ambulance corps of which they are members at any time or while performing any other duties of such ambulance corps as are authorized by the municipality;(3) officers, directors, rescue and lifesaving squad members or any other members of volunteer rescue and lifesaving squads of the various municipalities who shall be and are hereby declared to be employes of such municipalities for the purposes of this act and who shall be entitled to receive compensation in the case of injuries received while actually engaged as a rescue and lifesaving squad member attending to any emergency to which that squad has been called or responded including travel from and the direct return to a squad person's home, place of business or other place where he shall have been when he received the call or alarm or while participating in rescue and lifesaving drills in which the squad is participating; while repairing or doing other work about or on the apparatus, buildings and grounds of such rescue and lifesaving squad upon the authorization of the chief or other person in charge; [or] while riding in or upon the apparatus of the rescue and lifesaving squad; or while engaging in organized fundraising activities and at any time while performing any other duties authorized by the municipality;* * *(f) The term "members of volunteer fire departments or volunteer fire companies" when used in this article shall mean 20250HB2087PN2684 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any of the following:* * *(4) A participating member of a volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company who provides necessary operational support to the volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company but does not respond to emergency calls. Operational support includes maintaining the station and equipment, acting as trustee, organizing [fundraisers] or engaging in organized fundraising activity, providing information technology support and assisting with recruitment and other administrative tasks, if the operational support activity is conducted on a regular basis for the benefit of a volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company as approved at the beginning of each policy year by the authority, organization or municipality purchasing workers' compensation insurance for the volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company.The term does not include a social member of a volunteer fire department or volunteer fire company.(g) The term "members of volunteer ambulance corps" when used in this article shall mean any of the following:* * *(3) A participating member of a volunteer ambulance corps who provides necessary operational support to the volunteer ambulance corps but does not respond to emergency calls. Operational support includes maintaining the station and equipment, acting as trustee, organizing [fundraisers] or engaging in organized fundraising activity, providing information technology support and assisting with recruitment and other administrative tasks, if the operational support activity is conducted on a regular basis for the benefit of a 20250HB2087PN2684 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 volunteer ambulance corps.The term does not include a social member of a volunteer ambulance corps.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2087PN2684 - 5 - 12345